Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 49.5
FOREIGN-TRADE ZONES

Section

7-49.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Foreign-trade Zones Act".

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective March 26.

7-49.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state of Colorado to maintain this state's economic and commercial viability in the world of national and international commerce by providing incentives to encourage growth in existing industries and to attract new industry. To that end, foreign-trade zones are established, operated, and maintained pursuant to a grant of privilege from the foreign-trade zones board upon proper application in accordance with the "Foreign-trade Zones Act of 1934", 19 U.S.C. sec. 81. This article is enacted to allow designated corporations, including the city and county of Denver, to make application for such grant of the privilege to establish such a foreign-trade zone in Colorado.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective March 26.

7-49.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Act" means the congressional act commonly known as the "Foreign-trade Zones Act of 1934", 19 U.S.C. sec. 81.

"Corporation" means a public corporation or a private corporation.

"Foreign merchandise" means merchandise of any class that would be subject to United States customs law if and when entered into United States customs territory.

"Foreign-trade zone" means a foreign-trade zone established under a grant of privilege from the foreign-trade zones board, as defined in the act, and includes foreign-trade subzones as designated by the United States department of commerce.

"Private corporation" means any corporation (other than a public corporation) formed for the purpose of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in the state of Colorado under this article, in accordance with the act.

"Public corporation" means the state of Colorado, any political subdivision, municipality, or city and county thereof, any public agency of the state of Colorado, any political subdivision, municipality, or city and county thereof, or any corporate municipal instrumentality of the state of Colorado or of the state of Colorado and one or more other states.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 2003:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 2211, § 37, effective July 1, 2004.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-49.5-104. Foreign-trade zone - authority to establish, operate, and maintain.

Any corporation may apply for a grant of the privilege to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign-trade zone. If such grant of privilege is made, such corporation may accept the grant and do all things necessary and proper in furtherance of the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the foreign-trade zone. Any action taken under this section shall be in accordance with the act and any rules and regulations as may be promulgated thereunder.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 448, § 1, effective March 26.

7-49.5-105. Foreign-trade zone - site.

Any corporation making an application for a grant of the privilege to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign-trade zone may select and describe the site of such foreign-trade zone in accordance with the act and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 448, § 1, effective March 26.

7-49.5-106. Taxation of merchandise.

Freeport merchandise and stocks of merchandise as defined in section 39-1-102 (15), C.R.S., brought as foreign merchandise into a foreign-trade zone, established pursuant to a grant of privilege under this article, are exempt from taxation by the state of Colorado or any political subdivision thereof to the extent that such taxation is inhibited by provisions of the United States constitution or law enacted thereunder pertaining to goods in international commerce.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 448, § 1, March 26.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1487, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2211, § 38, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

Section 39-1-102 (15), which defined "stocks of merchandise", was repealed by section 11 of chapter 425, Session Laws of Colorado 1983.

Cross references:

For exemption from property tax of inventories of merchandise and materials and supplies that are held for consumption by a business or are held primarily for sale, see § 39-3-119.

7-49.5-107. Severability.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be severable.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 448, § 1, effective March 26.